District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0780.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Food & Friends Property Tax Exemption Emergency Amendment Act
of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Chapter 10 of Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as
follows:
(a) The table of contents is amended by adding a new section designation to read as
follows:
“47-1099.15. Food & Friends, Inc.; Lot 0005, Square 3766.”.
(b) A new section 47-1099.15 is added to read as follows:
“§ 47-1099.15. Food & Friends, Inc.; Lot 0005, Square 3766.
“(a) The real property, and any improvements on the property, located at 219 Riggs
Road, NE, known for tax and assessment purposes as Lot 0005, Square 3766 (“Property”), shall
be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 8 of this title; provided, that the Property is owned
by Food & Friends, Inc.; and provided further, that Food & Friends, Inc., or any lessee of the
Property, continues to use the Property to provide charitable food distribution or related services.
“(b) This exemption, based on the square footage of the site, shall apply to 100% of the
land.
“(c) The tax exemption provided pursuant to this section shall be in addition to and not in
lieu of any other tax relief or assistance from any other source applicable to Food & Friends,
Inc.”.
Sec. 3. Applicability.
This act shall apply as of October 1, 2025.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and shall remain in effect for no longer than
90 days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in section
412(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813;
D.C. Official Code § 1-204.12(a)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2